Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 19 Real Property of Decedents and Incompetents

33-19-1.
Court consent to mortgage.

The probate court which issued letters testamentary or of administration or guardianship may authorize an executor, administrator, or guardian to mortgage the real estate of the deceased or ward upon a petition filed, describing the particular estate to be mortgaged, the amount of money necessary to be raised, and the purpose for which the money is required, and the decree of the court upon the petition shall fix the amount for which the mortgage is to be given and the rate of interest which may be paid on the mortgage, and may order the whole or any part of the loan to be paid from time to time out of the income of the property mortgaged.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 737; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 4; P.L. 1918, ch. 1640, § 2; P.L. 1920, ch. 1844, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-1

; P.L. 1995, ch. 323, § 28.

33-19-2.
Terms of mortgages and notes.

A mortgage given by an executor, administrator, or guardian, under leave from a probate court, may contain such powers of sale, conditions and covenants as are usual in mortgages taken by savings banks in this state. Notes secured by, and covenants contained in, mortgages given by executors, administrators, and guardians, so far as those notes and covenants are made by the executor, administrator, or guardian as such, shall not bind the executor, administrator, or guardian personally, but only the estate of the deceased or ward.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 751; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 18; P.L. 1918, ch. 1640, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-2

.

33-19-3.
Authority to sell real estate.

The probate court which issued letters testamentary, of administration, guardianship, or conservatorship may grant authority to an executor or administrator to sell the real estate of a deceased person, or to a guardian or conservator to sell the real estate of his or her ward, for cash or on credit, upon a petition filed describing the particular estate to be sold and setting forth the facts on which the petition is founded.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 738; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-3

; P.L. 1983, ch. 204, § 3.

33-19-4.
Sale of whole real estate to prevent injury.

If in any case it appears to the court to be necessary to sell only a part of the real estate described, but that by the partial sale, the residue of the estate or of some part thereof would be greatly injured, the court may authorize the sale of the whole of the estate or such part of the estate as may appear advisable.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 739; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-4

.

33-19-5.
Finality of decree authorizing sale or mortgage — Claims against estate.

When a decree is granted by a probate court authorizing a sale or mortgage of real estate of a deceased person, or of a person under guardianship, the adjudication of the court that the sale or mortgage is required shall be final so far as it may affect any title acquired by virtue of the decree; but nothing contained in this section shall affect the right of the executor, administrator, or guardian to contest the validity of any claim against the estate or ward.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 760; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 27; P.L. 1918, ch. 1640, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-5

.

33-19-6.
Duration of authority to sell or mortgage.

Every license granted by a probate court to sell real estate shall continue in force for one year, and every license to mortgage real estate shall continue in force for six (6) months, from the date of the decree; but the conveyance may be executed and delivered after these periods, respectively.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 761; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-6

.

33-19-7.
Executor’s or administrator’s bond to cover application of proceeds of mortgage or sale.

Every executor or administrator empowered to sell or mortgage real estate as provided in §

33-19-3

shall, before making the sale or mortgage, give bond with a surety or sureties satisfactory to the court that he or she will apply the proceeds of the sale or mortgage to the purposes for which it was made.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 744; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-7

.

33-19-8.
Guardian’s bond to cover proceeds of the sale or mortgage.

Every guardian empowered to sell or mortgage as provided in this chapter shall, before making the sale or mortgage, give bond with a surety or sureties satisfactory to the court that he or she will apply the proceeds of the sale or mortgage to the purposes for which the sale or mortgage was authorized, and invest the proceeds, or the surplus thereof, as the case may be, in such investments as are allowed by law, or in such other manner as the court may direct.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 745; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-8

.

33-19-9.
Public or private sale — Petitioner as purchaser — Minimum price fixed.

The probate court may authorize executors, administrators, and guardians, at their option, to sell real estate of a deceased or of a ward, either at public auction or by private contract. The court, on petition with notice, if satisfied that the action will not be prejudicial to the interests of the estate, may authorize the petitioner to become the purchaser of the real estate, at public or private sale; provided, however, that, in any instance, if a sale be made by private contract, the sale shall be made for not less than the sum fixed by the court in its decree authorizing the sale.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 740; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 7; P.L. 1929, ch. 1378, § 1; P.L. 1931, ch. 1768, § 1; P.L. 1936, ch. 2391, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-9

.

33-19-10.
Notice of sale at auction.

Before making any sale at auction, the executor, administrator, or guardian shall publish notice of the time, place, and conditions of sale for four (4) successive weeks in some public newspaper designated by the court in the decree authorizing the sale, and shall give additional notice of the auction sale in such manner as the court in its decree may direct.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 747; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-10

.

33-19-11.
Adjournment of auction sale.

The executor, administrator, or guardian may, in his or her discretion, adjourn any auction sale to a future day, whenever he or she may deem it advisable, giving notice of the adjournment in the same manner in which notice of the sale was given, as soon as may be after the adjournment and up to the day of the adjourned sale, unless the adjournment shall be from day to day only, and then by making public proclamation at the time and place of the sale and by setting up a notice of the sale at the appointed place.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 748; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-11

.

33-19-12.
Affidavit as to notice of sale.

The executor, administrator, or guardian making the sale shall, within ten (10) days after providing notice, make and file in the office of the probate clerk an affidavit stating the times and places of giving notice, which shall be prima facie evidence of the matters stated in the notice.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 750; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-12

.

33-19-13.
Laying out of roads and platting of land.

Probate courts shall also have the power to grant petitions of executors, administrators, or guardians for leave to lay out, make, or dedicate highways, streets, or gangways upon lands of the deceased or ward, and to plat those lands into house lots, with streets, gangways, or open spaces: (1) in the case of executors or administrators, as preliminary to the sales of lands of the deceased, and (2) in the case of guardians, either as preliminary to the sale or as beneficial to the estate of the ward; provided, that no petition shall be granted except upon notice, as the court may require, and upon proof that the action will be beneficial to the estate.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 741; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-13

.

33-19-14.
Conditions imposed by court.

In granting any petition under any of the preceding sections, the court may impose such conditions, in addition to those imposed by law, as it may see fit.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 742; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-14

.

33-19-15.
Conveyances.

Every executor, administrator, or guardian making a sale as provided in this chapter may, by virtue of his or her authority, make and execute, in due form of law, conveyances of the real estate sold; and the conveyances shall make as good title to the purchaser as the testator or intestate in his or her lifetime, or ward, being competent, could have made.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 749; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-15

.

33-19-16.
Sale by guardian and payment of proceeds to fiduciary in nonresident ward’s domicile.

A guardian appointed within this state, whose ward leaves or resides out of the state, may sell the real property of his or her ward and transfer and pay over the whole or any part of the proceeds or of the ward’s personal property to a guardian, trustee, or committee appointed by competent authority in the state or country in which the ward resides, upon such terms and in such manner as the probate court by which he or she was appointed may, after notice to all parties interested, decree upon petition filed therefor.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 746; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-16

.

33-19-17.
Release of interests in real estate by guardians.

Guardians, after giving notice as required upon petition for leave to sell real estate, may be authorized by probate courts to release and discharge a vested, contingent or possible right or interest in or to real estate, upon such terms and conditions as may appear to the courts to be proper.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 753; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-17

.

33-19-18.
Sale of cemetery lots.

Probate courts may authorize executors, administrators, and guardians, after notice to all persons interested as provided, or upon the assent of all interested persons, filed in court, to sell and convey or release, upon the terms and in such manner as the courts may order, lots in cemeteries belonging to the persons or estates by them represented, when no provision to the contrary is made by will, deed, or the charter of the cemetery corporation.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 754; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-18

.

33-19-19.
Exchange of cemetery lots by guardians.

Probate courts may authorize guardians appointed or approved by them to exchange any lot of their wards in any burial ground or cemetery within this state, or any right or interest of their wards in any burial or cemetery lot, for any lot, right, or interest in the lot or in any other burial ground or cemetery, upon such terms and conditions as the courts may prescribe; provided, that in all such exchanges the title of the lot, right, or interest taken in exchange shall be taken in the name or names of the ward or wards whose lot, right, or interest is given in exchange.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 755; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-19

.

33-19-20.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 755; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 22; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 323, § 29, effective July 5, 1995.

33-19-21.
Irregularities in proceedings.

No sale of real estate made by an executor, administrator, or guardian, under decree of a probate court, and no title under the sale, shall be avoided because the deed was not delivered within one year after the decree, or on account of any irregularity in the proceedings, if it appears:

That the decree was granted by a court of competent jurisdiction;

That the person authorized to make the sale gave a bond, if bond was required, which was approved by the probate court;

That the notice of the time and place of sale, if at public auction, was given according to law and the order of the court; and

That the premises were sold by public auction in accordance with the notice, or by private contract in pursuance of the decree, and are held by one who purchased them in good faith or by some one claiming under him or her.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 758; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-21

.

33-19-22.
Validity of sale as against claimant adverse to decedent or ward.

If the validity of a sale is drawn in question by a person claiming adversely to the title of the deceased or of the ward, or claiming under a title that is not derived from or through the deceased or the ward, the sale shall not be held to be void on account of any irregularity in the proceedings, if it appears that the executor, administrator or guardian was authorized to make the sale by a court of competent jurisdiction, and that he or she accordingly executed and acknowledged in legal form a deed for the conveyance of the premises.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 759; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-22

.

33-19-23.
Surplus real estate proceeds distributed as real estate.

Surplus proceeds arising from the sale or mortgage of the real estate of a deceased person by an executor or administrator, or from the sale or mortgage of the real estate of a ward by his or her guardian, remaining on the settlement of the final account of the executor, administrator or guardian, shall be considered as real estate, and shall pass to, or be distributed in the same proportions among, the same persons who would have taken the real estate if it had not been sold or mortgaged.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 743; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 10; P.L. 1918, ch. 1640, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-23

.

33-19-24.
Examination of sale proceedings — Recovery of damages.

Every executor, administrator, and guardian authorized to sell real estate by decree of court shall be required, upon application to the probate court by an heir, creditor, ward, or other person interested in the estate, to make answer, upon oath, as to all matters touching his or her compliance with the decree, as fully as he or she is liable, to account and be examined in reference to the personal estate. If there is any neglect or misconduct of the executor, administrator, or guardian in complying with the decree, or in making the sale under the decree, by which a person interested in the estate suffers damage, the person may recover damages for the neglect or misconduct on the probate bond or otherwise, as the case may require.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 757; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-24

.

33-19-25.
Compliance with legal requirements examined on settlement of fiduciary’s accounts.

In settling the accounts of executors, administrators, and guardians, the probate courts shall examine and adjudge whether they have complied with the law and the directions of the court in regard to the sale or mortgage of real estate.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 752; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-25

.

33-19-26.
Authority for lease by guardian.

The probate court which appointed or approved a guardian, upon the petition of the guardian, setting forth a description of the real estate which it is proposed to lease, upon hearing, after the notice as the court shall order, may authorize the guardian to give a written lease of the real estate or any part thereof, and the decree of the court shall fix the term and the rental, and approve the form of the lease; provided, that a guardian of a minor shall not lease the real estate of his or her ward beyond the ward’s minority.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 762; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-26

.

33-19-27.
Sale, lease, or mortgage by foreign guardian of nonresident ward.

If any person who resides out of the state, but within the United States, is under guardianship in the state, territory, or district where he or she resides, and has no guardian appointed in this state, the foreign guardian may file a copy of his or her appointment, duly authenticated according to an act of congress in those cases, in the probate court of any town or city in this state in which there is real estate of the ward. After filing and upon petition to the probate court, he or she may be authorized to sell, mortgage, or lease the real estate of the ward in any town or city, for the purposes, in the manner, after like notice, and upon the terms provided in this chapter in case of sale, mortgage, or lease, by a guardian appointed in this state.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 763; G.L. 1909, ch. 308, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 359, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 570, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-27

.

33-19-28.
Definitions of terms in § 33-19-27.

“Guardian” as used in §

33-19-27

shall be deemed to include a guardian, conservator, curator, committee, or trustee, and any other fiduciary having substantially the same powers and duties as a guardian, conservator, curator, committee, or trustee, with reference to the estate or property of a minor or person non sui juris, or otherwise incapacitated; and a person shall be deemed “under guardianship” within the meaning of §

33-19-27

if a guardian, conservator, curator, committee, or trustee, or other fiduciary having substantially the duties of a guardian, conservator, curator, committee, or trustee has been appointed with reference to his or her estate or property.

This section shall be deemed to be declaratory of the purposes of §

33-19-27

as originally enacted, and shall not be construed so as to invalidate any action taken by any fiduciary heretofore under §

33-19-27

.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 570, § 30, as enacted by P.L. 1947, ch. 1955, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1955, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

33-19-28

.